Massachusetts, session 194th, S2414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, subject
to the appropriation of up to $5,000,000, ENSATS shall construct a tunnel to connect the north
and south campuses and Danvers Rail Trail, a section of the Massachusetts Rail Trail system.
Recognizing a pressing need for student safety, increased accessibility, and congestion reduction,
this tunnel shall be of benefit to all persons of the Commonwealth.
of 1